Utah statutes.
32B-10-604.   Specific operational requirements for religious wine use permit.

(1) (a)  In addition to complying with Section 32B-10-206, a religious wine permittee and staff of the religious wine permittee shall comply with this section.

(b)  Failure to comply as provided in Subsection (1)(a) may result in disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, against:

(i)  a religious wine permittee;

(ii)  individual staff of a religious wine permittee; or

(iii)  a religious wine permittee and staff of the religious wine permittee.

(2)  A religious wine use permittee may purchase wine from a state store as the department may designate at the department's cost plus freight charges.

(3)  A religious wine use permittee may not use wine purchased under a religious wine use permit for a purpose other than a religious purpose.

